Arkansas, session 2025, HB1626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-57-203, concerning definitions within
the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(38) "Disposable vapor product" means a vapor product that:
(A) Has a battery that is not detachable from the atomizer
or vaporizer;
(B) Cannot be refilled with e-liquid; and
(C) Is designed to be disposed of after the e-liquid is
used; and
(39) “Prohibited foreign party” means the same as in § 18-11-802.
*JMB119*
03-19-2025 14:13:28 JMB119

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 H3/19/25 HB1626

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 57, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-57-269. Prohibition on sale of disposable vapor product.
(a) A person or entity shall not sell or offer for sale at retail in
this state a disposable vapor product from a prohibited foreign party.
(b)(1) The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control may seize and hold for
disposition of the courts or the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board any
disposable vapor product sold or offered for sale in violation of this
section.
(2) The processes of seizure, forfeiture, and disposition under
§ 26-57-247 and the destruction of the seized products under § 26-57-249
shall apply to this section.
(c) A violation of subsection (a) of this section is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(d) This section does not apply to a product that has been approved by
the United States Food and Drug Administration.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Notice of act
requirements and allowance of a grace period.
The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control shall notify manufacturers,
wholesalers, retailers, and vendors licensed under § 26-57-219 of:
(1) The requirements of this act and the time frame in which
compliance is required; and
(2) The allowance of a ninety-day grace period following the
effective date of this act during which any disposal vapor product from a
prohibited foreign party in their possession shall be liquidated, sold, or
disposed of.

/s/Duffield






03-19-2025 14:13:28 JMB119